Utah statutes.
10-2-425.   Filing of notice and plat -- Recording and notice requirements
-- Effective date of annexation or boundary adjustment.
(1)  The legislative body of each municipality that enacts an ordinance under
this part approving the annexation of an unincorporated area or the adjustment
of a boundary shall:
(a)  within 30 days after enacting the ordinance or, in the case of a boundary
adjustment, within 30 days after each of the municipalities involved in the
boundary adjustment has enacted an ordinance, file with the lieutenant
governor:
(i)  a notice of an impending boundary action, as defined in Section
67-1a-6.5, that meets the requirements of Subsection 67-1a-6.5(3); and
(ii)  a copy of an approved final local entity plat, as defined in Section
67-1a-6.5; and
(b)  upon the lieutenant governor's issuance of a certificate of annexation or
boundary adjustment, as the case may be, under Section 67-1a-6.5:
(i) (A)  if the annexed area or area subject to the boundary adjustment is
located within the boundary of a single county, submit to the recorder of that
county:
(I)  the original:
(Aa)  notice of an impending boundary action;
(Bb)  certificate of annexation or boundary adjustment; and
(Cc)  approved final local entity plat; and
(II)  a certified copy of the ordinance approving the annexation or boundary
adjustment; or
(B)  if the annexed area or area subject to the boundary adjustment is located
within the boundaries of more than a single county:
(I)  submit to the recorder of one of those counties:
(Aa)  the original of the documents listed in Subsections (1)(b)(i)(A)(I)(Aa),
(Bb), and (Cc); and
(Bb)  a certified copy of the ordinance approving the annexation or boundary
adjustment; and
(II)  submit to the recorder of each other county:
(Aa)  a certified copy of the documents listed in Subsections
(1)(b)(i)(A)(I)(Aa), (Bb), and (Cc); and
(Bb)  a certified copy of the ordinance approving the annexation or boundary
adjustment;
(ii)  send notice of the annexation or boundary adjustment to each affected
entity; and
(iii)  in accordance with Section 26-8a-414, file with the Department of
Health:
(A)  a certified copy of the ordinance approving the annexation of an
unincorporated area or the adjustment of a boundary; and
(B)  a copy of the approved final local entity plat.
(2)  If an annexation or boundary adjustment under this part also causes an
automatic annexation to a local district under Section 17B-1-416 or an
automatic withdrawal from a local district under Subsection 17B-1-502(2), the
municipal legislative body shall, as soon as practicable after the lieutenant
governor issues a certificate of annexation or boundary adjustment under
Section 67-1a-6.5, send notice of the annexation or boundary adjustment to the
local district to which the annexed area is automatically annexed or from
which the annexed area is automatically withdrawn.
(3)  Each notice required under Subsection (1) relating to an annexation or
boundary adjustment shall state the effective date of the annexation or
boundary adjustment, as determined under Subsection (4).
(4)  An annexation or boundary adjustment under this part is completed and
takes effect:
(a)  for the annexation of or boundary adjustment affecting an area located in
a county of the first class, except for an annexation under Section 10-2-418:
(i)  July 1 following the lieutenant governor's issuance under Section
67-1a-6.5 of a certificate of annexation or boundary adjustment if:
(A)  the certificate is issued during the preceding November 1 through April
30; and
(B)  the requirements of Subsection (1) are met before that July 1; or
(ii)  January 1 following the lieutenant governor's issuance under Section
67-1a-6.5 of a certificate of annexation or boundary adjustment if:
(A)  the certificate is issued during the preceding May 1 through October 31;
and
(B)  the requirements of Subsection (1) are met before that January 1; and
(b)  for all other annexations and boundary adjustments, the date of the
lieutenant governor's issuance, under Section 67-1a-6.5, of a certificate of
annexation or boundary adjustment.
(5) (a)  As used in this Subsection (5):
(i)  "Affected area" means:
(A)  in the case of an annexation, the annexed area; and
(B)  in the case of a boundary adjustment, any area that, as a result of the
boundary adjustment, is moved from within the boundary of one municipality to
within the boundary of another municipality.
(ii)  "Annexing municipality" means:
(A)  in the case of an annexation, the municipality that annexes an
unincorporated area; and
(B)  in the case of a boundary adjustment, a municipality whose boundary
includes an affected area as a result of a boundary adjustment.
(b)  The effective date of an annexation or boundary adjustment for purposes
of assessing property within an affected area is governed by Section
59-2-305.5.
(c)  Until the documents listed in Subsection (1)(b)(i) are recorded in the
office of the recorder of each county in which the property is located, a
municipality may not:
(i)  levy or collect a property tax on property within an affected area;
(ii)  levy or collect an assessment on property within an affected area; or
(iii)  charge or collect a fee for service provided to property within an
affected area, unless the municipality was charging and collecting the fee
within that area immediately before annexation.
